Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 35. Public Employees’ Retirement System of Alaska.

Cross references. —

For group life and health insurance for retired public officers and employees, see AS

39.30.090

. For retirement incentive program, see §§ 21-35, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For public employees’ retirement system, see 2 AAC 35.

Editor’s notes. —

In general, a person’s right to benefits under the state’s public employee retirement systems vests when the person joins the system. Hammond v. Hoffbeck, 627 P.2d 1052 (Alaska 1981). Therefore, former law may govern the benefits of some members of the teachers’ retirement system. The user is advised to ascertain which version of a particular statute is applicable. Earlier versions of the statutes can be found in prior editions of the Alaska Statutes or in the published Session Laws of Alaska.

This chapter was extensively amended by ch. 82, SLA 1986. Sections 57-58, ch. 82, SLA 1986, as amended by § 34, ch. 106, SLA 1988, provide:
“Sections 16, 22-23, 25-27, 42, 44, 45, and 50 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after June 30, 1986. Changes in the Public Employees’ Retirement System enacted in this Act that require a reduction in benefits to members of the retirement system apply only to members who are first hired under the retirement system after June 30, 1986
. . .. The amendments made by secs. 46 and 49 of this Act apply only to members first hired under the Public Employees’ Retirement System after December 31, 1986
. . .. Other sections of this Act apply to all members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, regardless of the date of hire.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 92, SLA 2004 (SB 232), making a series of amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with federal Internal Revenue Service changes that maintain the retirement system as a qualified plan, see 2003 Senate Journal 1722 - 1723.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This fund does not represent an unconstitutional dedication of public funds under § 7, art. IX, of the state constitution, as that section of the constitution contains an implied exception for pension fund contributions.
November 30, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.